Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2707
Funds; records.

Any funds held by
the professional employer organization in a fiduciary capacity shall be recorded
separately and held in a fiduciary capacity on behalf of each client. The
professional employer organization shall keep copies of all the records pertaining
to such deposits and withdrawals and, upon request of a client, shall furnish
the client with an accounting and copies of the records.

Laws 2010, LB579, § 7.